District of Columbia statutes.
15-914

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting similar legislation.

History

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 101, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(e), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-914.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105 substituted “this chapter” for “this act” in two places.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “this chapter” for “this subchapter”.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 14 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.